Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 3
REGISTRATION, TAXATION, AND LICENSE PLATES

Editor's note:

This title was amended with relocations in 1994, and this article was subsequently amended with relocations in 2005, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2005, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For disposition of fines and penalties under this article, see § 42-1-217.

Section

PART 1 REGISTRATION AND TAXATION

PART 2 LICENSE PLATES

PART 3 FEES AND CASH FUNDS